Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 496.018, as amended by section  107, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
496.018. (1) In order to be  considered a person with a disability under the wildlife laws, a person
shall provide to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission either:
[(1)] (a)  Written certification from a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner or licensed
physician associate that states that the person:
[(a)] (A)  Is permanently unable to walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane,
crutch, prosthetic device, wheelchair, scooter or walker;
[(b)] (B)  Is restricted  by lung disease to the extent that the person’s forced expiratory volume
for one second, when measured by a spirometer, is  less than 35 percent predicted, or arterial oxygen
tension is less than 55 mm/Hg on room air at rest;
[(c)] (C) Has a cardiac condition to the extent  that the person’s functional limitations are clas-
sified in severity as Class III or Class IV, according to  standards established by the American Heart
Association;
[(d)] (D)  Has a permanent, physical impairment  that prevents the person from holding or
shooting a firearm or bow or from holding a fishing rod in hand; or
[(e)] (E)  Has central visual acuity that  permanently does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye
with corrective lenses, or the widest diameter of the visual field is no greater than 20 degrees; or
[(2)] (b)  Written proof that the last official  certification of record by the United States Depart-
ment of Veterans Affairs or any branch of the Armed  Forces of the United States shows the person
to be at least 65 percent disabled.
(2) In order to be considered a person with a disability  under provisions of the wildlife
laws that pertain to angling or harvesting shellfish, a person  shall provide to the commission
either:
(a) Written certification described in subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(b) Written proof described in subsection (1)(b) of this section; or
(c) Written certification  from a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner or licensed
physician associate that states  that the person has an intellectual or developmental disability
that prevents the person  from holding or operating angling or shellfish harvesting equip-
Enrolled House Bill 2163 (HB 2163-INTRO) Page 1
ment, including rods, reels, clam guns, shovels and other  equipment typically used for angl-
ing or for harvesting shellfish.
Passed by House February 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2163 (HB 2163-INTRO) Page 2